Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-386.08
Unincorporated mutual associations; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of sections 44-386.01 to 44-386.07, for the procedures for examination of books and records, for the requirements of reports, and for procedures for approval of changes or additions of evidence of insurance coverage to be used by the associations.

Laws 1969, c. 367, § 7, p. 1306;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 108.